Maryland, session 2026, HB0047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 42. COMMISSION ON STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT REAL PROPERTY
BEARING CONFEDERATE NAMES.
9–4201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0047*

HOUSE BILL 47
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE COMMISSION ON STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT REAL PROPERTY BEARING CONFEDERATE NAMES.
(C) “CONFEDERATE NAME” MEANS ANY NAME THAT COMMEMORATES OR
REFERENCES ANY ASPECT OF THE STATES IN REBELLION OPERATING AS THE
CONFEDERATE STATES OF AMERICA FROM 1861 THROUGH 1865 OR ANY PERSON
OR ENTITY THAT SERVED VOLUNTARILY WITH OR ON BEHALF OF THE
CONFEDERATE STATES OF AMERICA IN ANY MILITARY OR CIVILIAN CAPACITY.
(D) “POLITICAL SUBDIVISION” MEANS:
(1) A COUNTY;
(2) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION;
(3) AN UNINCORPORATED TOWN;
(4) A SCHOOL DISTRICT;
(5) A SPECIAL DISTRICT; OR
(6) THE MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND PLANNING
COMMISSION.
(E) “REAL PROPERTY” INCLUDES STREETS, BUILDINGS, PARKS, AND
SUBDIVISIONS.
9–4202.
(A) THERE IS A COMMISSION ON STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT REAL
PROPERTY BEARING CONFEDERATE NAMES.
(B) THE COMMISSION IS AN INDEPENDENT UNIT IN THE EXECUTIVE
BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
9–4203.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF 24 MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR WITH THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE.
(2) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT 1 REPRESENTATIVE FROM EACH
COUNTY.

HOUSE BILL 47 3
(B) THE GOVERNOR MAY REMOVE A MEMBER FOR INCOMPETENCE OR
MISCONDUCT.
9–4204.
THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT ANNUALLY A CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR FROM
AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
9–4205.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY.
(2) IN ADDITION TO MEETING AT LEAST QUARTERLY, THE
COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT THE DISCRETION OF THE CHAIR OR THE GOVERNOR.
(B) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
9–4206.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL HIRE AN ARCHIVIST TO ASSIST THE
COMMISSION WITH ITS WORK.
(B) THE ARCHIVIST SHALL BE AN EMPLOYEE OF THE STATE ARCHIVES.
9–4207.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A FRAMEWORK TO IDENTIFY REAL
PROPERTY BEARING A CONFEDERATE NAME THAT IS OWNED BY THE STATE OR A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION; AND
(2) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE REAL PROPERTY
THAT SHOULD BE RENAMED.
(B) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2033, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT ITS
FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAYOR AND CITY

HOUSE BILL 47
COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY, THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH COUNTY, AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE THE
COMMISSION TO RENAME REAL PROPERTY OWNED BY THE STATE OR A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION.
9–4208.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY SEEK MONEY FROM THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT, FOUNDATIONS, AND PRIVATE SOURCES IN ADDITION TO STATE
FINANCING.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT GIFTS, GRANTS, DONATIONS,
BEQUESTS, OR ENDOWMENTS FOR ANY OF ITS PURPOSES.
(B) MONEY RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND
INCOME AND FEES DERIVED FROM EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS AND ACTIVITIES OF
THE COMMISSION ARE NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) MONEY MAINTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO AUDIT BY
THE STATE, INCLUDING THE LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2027. It shall remain effective for a period of 7 years and, at the end of June 30, 2034,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.